Utah statutes.
53B-15-101.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Disposable earnings" means the part of an employee's earnings remaining after the deduction of all amounts required by law to be withheld.

(2)  "Earnings" or "earnings from personal services" means compensation paid or payable for personal services, whether designated as wages, salary, commission, bonus, or otherwise, and includes periodic payments under a pension or retirement program.

(3)  "Public employee" means any employee, officer, or servant of the state of Utah, or any office, department, agency, authority, commission, board, institution, hospital, college, university, or other instrumentality of the state, or of any county, city, town, school district, special improvement or taxing district, or any other political subdivision or public corporation of or within the state.



Enacted by Chapter 167, 1987 General Session

